North Carolina statutes. Chapter 74D. Alarm Systems.
Article 1. Alarm Systems Licensing Act.
§ 74D-11.
(Effective until December 1, 2021) Enforcement.

The Board is authorized to apply in its own name to any judge of the Superior Court of the General Court of Justice for an injunction in order to prevent any violation or threatened violation of the provisions of this Chapter.

Any person, firm, association, corporation, or department or division of a firm, association or corporation, or their agents and employees violating any of the provisions of this Chapter or knowingly violating any rule promulgated to implement this Chapter shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The Attorney General, or his representative, shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the district attorneys of this State to prosecute violations of this Chapter.

The regulation of alarm systems businesses shall be exclusive to the Board; however, any city or county shall be permitted to require an alarm systems business operating within its jurisdiction to register and to supply information regarding its license, and may adopt an ordinance to require users of alarm systems to obtain revocable permits when alarm usage involves automatic signal transmission to a law-enforcement agency.

In lieu of revocation of suspension of a license or registration under

G.S. 74D-10

, a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) may be assessed by the Board against any person who violates any provision of this Chapter, or any rule of the Board adopted pursuant to this Chapter. In determining the amount of any penalty, the Board shall consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation. The clear proceeds of all penalties collected under this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

Proceedings for the assessment of civil penalties shall be governed by Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. If the person assessed a penalty fails to pay the penalty to the Board, the Board may institute an action in the superior court of the county in which the person resides or has his principal place of business to recover the unpaid amount of the penalty. An action to recover a civil penalty under this section shall not relieve any party from any other penalty prescribed by law.

The sale, installation, or service of an alarm system by an unlicensed or unregistered person shall constitute a threat to the public safety, and any contract for the sale, installation, or service of an alarm system shall be deemed void and unenforceable.

History.

1983, c. 786, s. 1; 1989, c. 730, s. 8; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 953, s. 10; 1993, c. 539, s. 558; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1998-215, s. 127; 2009-557, s. 7.

§ 74D-11.
Enforcement.

The Board may apply in its own name to any judge of the Superior Court of the General Court of Justice for an injunction in order to prevent any violation or threatened violation of the provisions of this Chapter.

Any person, firm, association, corporation, or department or division of a firm, association, or corporation or their agents and employees violating any of the provisions of this Chapter is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The Attorney General, or the Attorney General’s representative, has concurrent jurisdiction with the district attorneys of this State to prosecute violations of this Chapter.

The regulation of alarm systems businesses is exclusive to the Board; however, any city or county may require an alarm systems business operating within its jurisdiction to register and to supply information regarding its license and may adopt an ordinance to require users of alarm systems to obtain revocable permits when alarm usage involves automatic signal transmission to a law-enforcement agency.

In lieu of revocation of suspension of a license or registration under

G.S. 74D-10

, a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) may be assessed by the Board against any person that violates any provision of this Chapter or any rule of the Board adopted pursuant to this Chapter. In determining the amount of any penalty, the Board shall consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation. The clear proceeds of all penalties collected under this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

Proceedings for the assessment of civil penalties are governed by Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. If the person assessed a penalty fails to pay the penalty to the Board, the Board may institute an action in the superior court of the county in which the person resides or has a principal place of business to recover the unpaid amount of the penalty. An action to recover a civil penalty under this section does not relieve any party from any other penalty prescribed by law.

The sale, installation, or service of an alarm system by an unlicensed or unregistered person constitutes a threat to the public safety, and any contract for the sale, installation, or service of an alarm system is void and unenforceable.

History.

1983, c. 786, s. 1; 1989, c. 730, s. 8; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 953, s. 10; 1993, c. 539, s. 558; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1998-215, s. 127; 2009-557, s. 7; 2021-84, s. 4.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2021-84, s. 12, made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-84, s. 4, effective December 1, 2021, and applicable to offenses committed on or after that date. Session Laws 2021-84, s. 12, further provides: “Prosecutions for offenses committed before the effective date of this act are not abated or affected by this act, and the statutes that would be applicable but for this act remain applicable to those prosecutions.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-84, s. 4, rewrote the section. For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 74D-12.
Severability.

If any provision of this Chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is for any reason held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the Article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Chapter are declared to be severable.

History.

1983, c. 786, s. 1.

§ 74D-13.
Transfer of funds.

All fees collected pursuant to Chapter 74C of the General Statutes from alarm systems businesses which have not been expended upon January 1, 1984, shall be transferred to the Board by the Private Protective Services Board for the purpose of defraying the expenses of administering this act.

History.

1983, c. 786, s. 1.

§ 74D-14.
Proof of licensure to maintain or commence action.

An alarm systems business may not maintain any action in any court of the State for the collection of compensation for performing an act for which a license or registration is required by this Chapter without alleging and proving that the alarm systems business is appropriately licensed and the employee or agent of the alarm systems business is appropriately registered upon entering into a contract with the consumer. An alarm systems installation, maintenance, or monitoring contract entered into with a consumer shall be void if the consumer confirms through records maintained by the Board that the alarm systems business is not properly licensed or the consumer establishes through records maintained by the Board that the person enticing the consumer to enter into the contract is not properly registered by the Board. The sale, installation, or service of an alarm system by an unlicensed or unregistered employee shall be deemed an unfair and deceptive trade practice and shall be actionable under Chapter 75 of the General Statutes.

History.

2009-557, s. 8.

§§ 74D-15 through 74D-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.